North Carolina, session 2025, HB1073.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 105-153.7 reads as rewritten:
"§ 105-153.7. Individual income tax imposed.
(a) Tax. – A tax is imposed for each taxable year on the North Carolina taxable income
of every individual. The tax shall be levied, collected, and paid annually. Except as otherwise
provided in subsection (a1) subsections (a1) and (a2) of this section, the tax is a percentage of
the taxpayer's North Carolina taxable income computed as follows:
…
(a2) Rate on High Income. – A tax is imposed for each taxable year on the North Carolina
taxable income of every individual that exceeds one million dollars ($1,000,000) at a rate of
seven percent (7%). The tax imposed under this subsection shall be levied, collected, and paid
annually. The rate reduction trigger under subsection (a1) of this section shall not apply to the
tax rate imposed under this subsection. Annually, the Secretary shall distribute the taxes collected
under this subsection, less the Department of Revenue's allowance for administrative expenses
associated therewith, to the State Public School Fund for allotment by the State Board of
Education, on behalf of the counties, to local school administrative units on a per pupil basis in
accordance with Article IX, Section 7(b) of the North Carolina Constitution. The Secretary may
retain the Department of Revenue's cost of collection, not to exceed one hundred thousand dollars
($100,000) a year, as reimbursement to the Department.
…."
SECTION 2. This act is effective for taxable years beginning on or after January 1,
2026.
*H1073-v-1*